Colorado, session 2025B, HB25B-1007.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Rural communities are an invaluable component of Colorado's
culture, economy, and public health landscape;
(b) Rural communities disproportionately face financial and
accessibility obstacles to health coverage;
(c) The 2026 rate increases for private health insurance plans for
the individual market are projected to vary based on geographic area, with
average rates projected to increase by:
(I) 25.4% in the Denver area;
(II) 33.4% in eastern Colorado; and
(III) 38.8% in western Colorado;
(d) These significant cost impacts for rural communities
demonstrate a need for additional rural representation on the health
insurance affordability board to ensure residents in rural areas are
protected from health insurance coverage loss;
(e) The health insurance affordability board directly allocates
funding to facilitate reductions in premiums and avoid health insurance
coverage loss;
(f) Rural and republican representation on the health insurance
affordability board is essential to ensure the allocation of these funds
prioritizes documented Colorado citizens and our most vulnerable rural
communities;
(g) Colorado must continue to identify avenues to increase rural
participation in health care to ensure all documented communities within
-2- HB25B-1007

the state have access;
(h) The general assembly can no longer marginalize rural voices
and the communities that feed, power, and clothe the rest of the state; and
(i) By requiring geographic and political diversity on the health
insurance affordability board, Colorado can require that the governor
appoint members who adequately address all concerns regarding health
insurance coverage by protecting all taxpaying Coloradans who are at risk
of losing their health insurance coverage and representing the interests of
rural communities throughout the state.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-1207, amend
(1)(b); and add (1)(a.5) as follows:
10-16-1207. Health insurance affordability board - creation -
membership - powers and duties - subject to open meetings and
public records laws - commissioner rules. (1) (a.5) IN EXERCISING THE
GOVERNOR'S AUTHORITY TO APPOINT NINE OF THE MEMBERS TO THE
BOARD PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(a)(III) OF THIS SECTION, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL SELECT THE NINE MEMBERS IN A MANNER THAT RESULTS
IN THE BOARD CONSISTING OF FOUR MEMBERS WHO ARE REGISTERED
DEMOCRATS, FOUR MEMBERS WHO ARE REGISTERED REPUBLICANS, AND
ONE MEMBER WHO IS UNAFFILIATED.
(b) To the extent possible, the governor shall attempt to appoint
board members who reflect the diversity of the state with regard to race,
ethnicity, immigration status, income, wealth, ability, and geography. In
considering geographic diversity, the governor shall ensure at least one
member resides on the eastern plains IN A COUNTY WITH NO MORE THAN
FIFTY THOUSAND RESIDENTS AT THE TIME OF THE APPOINTMENT and one
member resides on the western slope IN A COUNTY WITH NO MORE THAN
-3- HB25B-1007

FIFTY THOUSAND RESIDENTS AT THE TIME OF THE APPOINTMENT and, to the
extent possible, shall attempt to appoint members from each
congressional district in the state.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly; except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant
to section 1 (3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an
item, section, or part of this act within such period, then the act, item,
section, or part will not take effect unless approved by the people at the
general election to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take
effect on the date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the
governor.
(2) This act applies to board appointments made on or after the
applicable effective date of this act.
-4- HB25B-1007